Hawaii statutes.
§634-32 Other laws not affected.
Nothing contained in sections 634-30 and 634-31 shall be construed to amend or
repeal chapter 425 or 432, article 1, or section 634-3. [L Sp 1949, c 4, §3; RL
1955, §230-41; HRS §634-68; ren HRS §634-32; am L 2016, c 55, §28]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next